Missouri, session 2026, HB1927.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 376.1350, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 376.1350 and 376.1368, to read as follows:
376.1350. For purposes of sections 376.1350 to [376.1390] 376.1389, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Adverse determination", a determination by a health carrier or a utilization
review entity that an admission, availability of care, continued stay or other health care
service furnished or proposed to be furnished to an enrollee has been reviewed and, based
upon the information provided, does not meet the utilization review entity or health carrier's
requirements for medical necessity, appropriateness, health care setting, level of care or
effectiveness, or are experimental or investigational, and the payment for the requested
service is therefore denied, reduced or terminated;
(2) "Ambulatory review", utilization review of health care services performed or
provided in an outpatient setting;
(3) "Case management", a coordinated set of activities conducted for individual
patient management of serious, complicated, protracted or other health conditions;
(4) "Certification", a determination by a health carrier or a utilization review entity
that an admission, availability of care, continued stay or other health care service has been
reviewed and, based on the information provided, satisfies the health carrier's requirements
for medical necessity, appropriateness, health care setting, level of care and effectiveness, and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1927 2
that payment will be made for that health care service provided the patient is an enrollee of
the health benefit plan at the time the service is provided;
(5) "Clinical peer", a physician or other health care professional who holds a
nonrestricted license in a state of the United States and in the same or similar specialty as
typically manages the medical condition, procedure or treatment under review;
(6) "Clinical review criteria", the written policies, written screening procedures, drug
formularies or lists of covered drugs, determination rules, decision abstracts, clinical
protocols, medical protocols, practice guidelines, and any other criteria or rationale used by
the health carrier or utilization review entity to determine the necessity and appropriateness of
health care services;
(7) "Concurrent review", utilization review conducted during a patient's hospital stay
or course of treatment;
(8) "Covered benefit" or "benefit", a health care service that an enrollee is entitled
under the terms of a health benefit plan;
(9) "Director", the director of the department of commerce and insurance;
(10) "Discharge planning", the formal process for determining, prior to discharge
from a facility, the coordination and management of the care that a patient receives following
discharge from a facility;
(11) "Drug", any substance prescribed by a licensed health care provider acting within
the scope of the provider's license and that is intended for use in the diagnosis, mitigation,
treatment or prevention of disease. The term includes only those substances that are approved
by the FDA for at least one indication;
(12) "Emergency medical condition", the sudden and, at the time, unexpected onset of
a health condition that manifests itself by symptoms of sufficient severity, regardless of the
final diagnosis that is given, that would lead a prudent lay person, possessing an average
knowledge of medicine and health, to believe that immediate medical care is required, which
may include, but shall not be limited to:
(a) Placing the person's health in significant jeopardy;
(b) Serious impairment to a bodily function;
(c) Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part;
(d) Inadequately controlled pain; or
(e) With respect to a pregnant woman who is having contractions:
a. That there is inadequate time to effect a safe transfer to another hospital before
delivery; or
b. That transfer to another hospital may pose a threat to the health or safety of the
woman or unborn child;

HB 1927 3
(13) "Emergency service", a health care item or service furnished or required to
evaluate and treat an emergency medical condition, which may include, but shall not be
limited to, health care services that are provided in a licensed hospital's emergency facility by
an appropriate provider;
(14) "Enrollee", a policyholder, subscriber, covered person or other individual
participating in a health benefit plan;
(15) "FDA", the federal Food and Drug Administration;
(16) "Facility", an institution providing health care services or a health care setting,
including but not limited to hospitals and other licensed inpatient centers, ambulatory surgical
or treatment centers, skilled nursing centers, residential treatment centers, diagnostic,
laboratory and imaging centers, and rehabilitation and other therapeutic health settings;
(17) "Grievance", a written complaint submitted by or on behalf of an enrollee
regarding the:
(a) Availability, delivery or quality of health care services, including a complaint
regarding an adverse determination made pursuant to utilization review;
(b) Claims payment, handling or reimbursement for health care services; or
(c) Matters pertaining to the contractual relationship between an enrollee and a health
carrier;
(18) "Health benefit plan", a policy, contract, certificate or agreement entered into,
offered or issued by a health carrier to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any
of the costs of health care services; except that, health benefit plan shall not include any
coverage pursuant to liability insurance policy, workers' compensation insurance policy, or
medical payments insurance issued as a supplement to a liability policy;
(19) "Health care professional", a physician or other health care practitioner licensed,
accredited or certified by the state of Missouri to perform specified health services consistent
with state law;
(20) "Health care provider" or "provider", a health care professional or a facility;
(21) "Health care service", a service for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure or
relief of a health condition, illness, injury or disease, including but not limited to the provision
of drugs or durable medical equipment;
(22) "Health carrier", an entity subject to the insurance laws and regulations of this
state that contracts or offers to contract to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for or reimburse
any of the costs of health care services, including a sickness and accident insurance company,
a health maintenance organization, a nonprofit hospital and health service corporation, or any
other entity providing a plan of health insurance, health benefits or health services; except
that such plan shall not include any coverage pursuant to a liability insurance policy, workers'

HB 1927 4
compensation insurance policy, or medical payments insurance issued as a supplement to a
liability policy;
(23) "Health indemnity plan", a health benefit plan that is not a managed care plan;
(24) "Inpatient psychiatric hospital services", inpatient hospital services
furnished to an inpatient of a mental health facility, as defined in section 632.005, for
the treatment of a mental disorder or mental illness, as such terms are defined in section
630.005;
(25) "Managed care plan", a health benefit plan that either requires an enrollee to use,
or creates incentives, including financial incentives, for an enrollee to use, health care
providers managed, owned, under contract with or employed by the health carrier;
100 [(25)] (26) "Participating provider", a provider who, under a contract with the health
101 carrier or with its contractor or subcontractor, has agreed to provide health care services to
102 enrollees with an expectation of receiving payment, other than coinsurance, co-payments or
103 deductibles, directly or indirectly from the health carrier;
104 [(26)] (27) "Peer-reviewed medical literature", a published scientific study in a
105 journal or other publication in which original manuscripts have been published only after
106 having been critically reviewed for scientific accuracy, validity and reliability by unbiased
107 independent experts, and that has been determined by the International Committee of Medical
108 Journal Editors to have met the uniform requirements for manuscripts submitted to
109 biomedical journals or is published in a journal specified by the United States Department of
110 Health and Human Services pursuant to Section 1861(t)(2)(B) of the Social Security Act (42
111 U.S.C. Section 1395x), as amended, as acceptable peer-reviewed medical literature. Peer-
112 reviewed medical literature shall not include publications or supplements to publications that
113 are sponsored to a significant extent by a pharmaceutical manufacturing company or health
114 carrier;
115 [(27)] (28) "Person", an individual, a corporation, a partnership, an association, a joint
116 venture, a joint stock company, a trust, an unincorporated organization, any similar entity or
117 any combination of the foregoing;
118 [(28)] (29) "Prior authorization", a certification made pursuant to a prior authorization
119 review, or notice as required by a health carrier or utilization review entity prior to the
120 provision of health care services;
121 [(29)] (30) "Prior authorization review", utilization review conducted prior to an
122 admission or a course of treatment, including but not limited to pre-admission review,
123 pretreatment review, utilization review, and case management;
124 [(30)] (31) "Retrospective review", utilization review of medical necessity that is
125 conducted after services have been provided to a patient, but does not include the review of a

HB 1927 5
126 claim that is limited to an evaluation of reimbursement levels, veracity of documentation,
127 accuracy of coding or adjudication for payment;
128 [(31)] (32) "Second opinion", an opportunity or requirement to obtain a clinical
129 evaluation by a provider other than the one originally making a recommendation for a
130 proposed health service to assess the clinical necessity and appropriateness of the initial
131 proposed health service;
132 [(32)] (33) "Stabilize", with respect to an emergency medical condition, that no
133 material deterioration of the condition is likely to result or occur before an individual may be
134 transferred;
135 [(33)] (34) "Standard reference compendia":
136 (a) The American Hospital Formulary Service-Drug Information; or
137 (b) The United States Pharmacopoeia-Drug Information;
138 [(34)] (35) "Utilization review", a set of formal techniques designed to monitor the
139 use of, or evaluate the clinical necessity, appropriateness, efficacy, or efficiency of, health
140 care services, procedures, or settings. Techniques may include ambulatory review, prior
141 authorization review, second opinion, certification, concurrent review, case management,
142 discharge planning or retrospective review. Utilization review shall not include elective
143 requests for clarification of coverage;
144 [(35)] (36) "Utilization review entity", a utilization review agent as defined in section
145 374.500, or an individual or entity that performs prior authorization reviews for a health
146 carrier or health care provider. A health carrier or health care provider is a utilization review
147 entity if it performs prior authorization review.
376.1368. A health carrier shall not require prior authorization of inpatient
psychiatric hospital services.
✔